North Dakota, session 69, HB1487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. TRANSFER OF LAND AUTHORIZED. The state of North Dakota, by and through the
department of transportation, shall convey certain real property consisting of approximately one and
one-quarter acres [.51 hectare] in the southwest corner of outlot 20 in the south half of the north half of
the northwest quarter of section twenty-eight, township one hundred fifty-five north, range eighty-two
west, Ward County, North Dakota, to the office of management and budget. Sections 54-01-05.2 and
54-01-05.5 do not apply to the transfer authorized by this section.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET - MINOT
BUILDING - LINE OF CREDIT - ONE-TIME FUNDING - EXEMPTION. The office of management and
budget may borrow up to $5,600,000 through a line of credit from the Bank of North Dakota during the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, the proceeds of which are appropriated to
the office of management and budget for the purpose of constructing a facility in Minot to lease to other
state agencies. The interest rate on the line of credit may not exceed the prevailing interest rate
charged to North Dakota governmental entities. If the office of management and budget accesses the
line of credit, the office of management and budget shall request a deficiency appropriation from the
seventieth legislative assembly to repay the line of credit. The appropriation in this section is considered
a one-time funding item. The appropriation in this section is not subject to section 54-44.1-11 and may
be continued into the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2029.
SECTION 3. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1487 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1487 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 74 Nays 17 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State